test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - skyáahl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AAHL_STEM_1

     skyáahl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: skyáahl
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl
     skyáahl+V+RELATIVE: skyáahls
     skyáahl+V+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahlang
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: skyáahläsaa
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: skyáahläs
     skyáahl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: skyáahläsaang
     skyáahl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: skyáahläsga
     skyáahl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahläsaas
     skyáahl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahläsaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asa'áa
     skyáahl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asa'áang
     skyáahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asaasdláa
     skyáahl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asaasdláang
     skyáahl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'uuj
     skyáahl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'uujang
     skyáahl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: skyáahläsaa'uujang
     skyáahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: skyáahl'us
     skyáahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'ujaa
     skyáahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'uujaangaa
     skyáahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahläsaa'us
     skyáahl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: skyáahl'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: skyáahl'ahlanggan
     skyáahl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ahlanggiinii
     skyáahl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: skyáahläsaa'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: skyáahl'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+REFLEXIVE: skyáahl'ahl
     skyáahl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: skyáahläseehl
     skyáahl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: skyáahl'uu
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'waa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'waa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'waang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: skyáahl'wägan
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'aawaa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: skyáahl'aawaan
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: skyáahl'waas
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: skyáahl'aawaas
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'waa.ang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'aawaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'wägiinii
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'wägaangaa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'wägaangaan
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: skyáahl'waaäsaa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: skyáahl'waaäs
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: skyáahl'waaäsaang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: skyáahl'waaäsga
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahl'waaäsaas
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'waaäsaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'waa'uuj
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'waa'uujang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: skyáahl'waaäsaa'uujang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: skyáahl'waa'us
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'waa'ujaa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'waa'uujaangaa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahl'waaäsaa'us
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: skyáahl'waa'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: skyáahl'waa'ahlanggan
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: skyáahl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: skyáahl'waa'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: skyáahl'aawaa'ahlang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: skyáahl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: skyáahl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: skyáahl'waa'ahl
     skyáahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: skyáahl'waaäseehl
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: skyáahl'ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'angga
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'anggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: skyáahl'anggan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'aangaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: skyáahl'aangaan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: skyáahl'ans
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: skyáahl'aangaas
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'angang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'aangaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: skyáahl'anggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'anggiinii
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'anggaangaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'anggaangaan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: skyáahl'angäsaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: skyáahl'angäs
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: skyáahl'angäsaang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: skyáahl'angäsga
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahl'angäsaas
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'angäsaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asaa'áng
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asaa'ánggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahlang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'uuj
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'uujang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: skyáahl'angäsaa'uujang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'us
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'ang'ujaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ang'uujaangaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahl'angäsaa'us
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: skyáahl'aang'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: skyáahl'aang'ahlanggan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: skyáahl'angäsaa'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: skyáahl'aang'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: skyáahl'aangaa'ahlang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: skyáahl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: skyáahl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: skyáahl'aang'ahl
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: skyáahl'angäseehl
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: skyáahl'ang'uu
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: skyáahl'ang'wägan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'ang'aawaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: skyáahl'ang'aawaan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: skyáahl'ang'waas
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: skyáahl'ang'aawaas
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'ang'waa.ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'ang'aawaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ang'wägiinii
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ang'wägaangaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ang'wägaangaan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: skyáahl'ang'waaäs
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: skyáahl'ang'waaäsga
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaas
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: skyáahl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waa'uuj
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waa'uujang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waa'us
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: skyáahl'ang'waa'ujaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: skyáahl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: skyáahl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: skyáahl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: skyáahl'ang'waa'ahlans
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: skyáahl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: skyáahl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: skyáahl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: skyáahl'ang'waa'ahl
     skyáahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: skyáahl'ang'waaäseehl
